Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.170

Determination of the supply of certain fuels—Notification—Declaration concerning the applicability of RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120.

(1) By November 30, 2008, the director shall determine whether the state's diesel fuel supply is comprised of at least ten percent biodiesel made predominantly from Washington feedstock.

(2) By November 30, 2008, the director shall determine whether the state's gasoline fuel supply is comprised of at least twenty percent ethanol made predominantly from Washington feedstock, without jeopardizing continued attainment of the federal clean air act's national ambient air quality standard for ozone pollution.

(3) By December 1, 2008, the director shall notify the governor and the legislature of the findings in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4) If the findings from the director indicate that the goals of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or both, have been achieved, then the governor shall issue an executive order declaring that RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, or both, are no longer applicable.

[ 2006 c 338 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.